California statutes. Probate Code
(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the guardian or conservator shall not be compensated from
 the estate for any costs or fees that the guardian or conservator incurred in unsuccessfully defending their fee request petition, opposing a petition, or any other unsuccessful request or action made by, or behalf of, the ward or conservatee.

(2) If the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that the defense, opposition, or other action described in paragraph (1) was made in good faith, was based upon the best interest of the ward or conservatee, and did not harm the ward or conservatee, the court may reduce the compensation awarded for the costs or fees incurred instead of denying it completely. The court shall state the reasons for its determination in writing or on the record.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the guardian, conservator, or
 attorney shall not be compensated with any government benefits program moneys unless deemed by the court as necessary to sustain the support and maintenance of the ward or conservatee, but in no event may this exceed the amount permitted by federal laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 24.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2640.1.

(a) If a person has petitioned for the appointment of a particular conservator and another conservator was appointed while the petition was pending, but not before the expiration of 90 days from the issuance of letters, the person who petitioned for the appointment of a conservator but was not appointed and that person’s attorney may petition the court for an order fixing and allowing compensation and reimbursement of costs, provided that the court determines that the petition was filed in the best interests of the conservatee.

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) Upon the hearing, the court shall make an order to allow both of the following:

(1) Any compensation or costs requested in the petition the court determines is just and reasonable to the person who petitioned for the appointment of a conservator but was not appointed, for his or her services rendered in connection with and to facilitate the appointment of a conservator, and costs incurred in connection therewith.

(2) Any compensation or costs requested in the petition the court determines is just and reasonable to the attorney for that person, for his or her services rendered in connection with and to facilitate the appointment of a conservator, and costs incurred in connection therewith.

Any compensation and costs allowed shall be charged to the estate of the conservatee. If a conservator of the estate is not appointed, but a conservator of the person is appointed, the compensation and costs allowed shall be ordered by the court to be paid from property belonging to the conservatee, whether held outright, in trust, or otherwise.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature for this section to have retroactive effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2641.

(a) At any time permitted by Section 2640 and upon the notice therein prescribed, the guardian or conservator of the person may petition the court for an order fixing and allowing compensation for services in the best interest of the ward or conservatee rendered to that time.

(b) Upon the hearing, the court shall make an order allowing any compensation the court determines is just and reasonable to the guardian or conservator of the person for services rendered in the best interest of the ward or conservatee. The compensation allowed to the guardian or conservator of the person may, in the discretion of the court, include compensation for services rendered before the date of the
 order appointing the guardian or conservator. The compensation allowed shall thereupon be charged against the estate.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the guardian or conservator shall not be compensated from the estate for any costs or fees that the guardian or conservator incurred in unsuccessfully defending their fee request petition, opposing a petition, or any other unsuccessful request or action made by, or behalf of, the ward or conservatee.

(2) If the court determines, by clear and convincing evidence, that the defense, opposition, or other action described in paragraph (1) was made in good faith, was based upon the best interest of the ward or conservatee, and did not harm the ward or conservatee, the court may reduce the compensation
 awarded for the costs or fees incurred instead of denying it completely. The court shall state the reasons for its determination in writing or on the record.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the guardian or conservator of the person shall not be compensated with any government benefits program moneys unless deemed by the court as necessary to sustain the support and maintenance of the ward or conservatee, but in no event may this exceed the amount permitted by federal laws and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 25.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2642.

(a) At any time permitted by Section 2640 and upon the notice therein prescribed, an attorney who has rendered legal services to the guardian or conservator of the person or estate or both, including services rendered under Section 2632, may petition the court for an order fixing and allowing compensation for such services rendered to that time. Legal services for which the attorney may petition the court for an order fixing and allowing compensation under this subdivision include those services rendered by any paralegal performing the legal services under the direction and supervision of an attorney. The petition or application for compensation shall set forth the hours spent and services performed by the paralegal.

(b) Upon the hearing, the court shall make an order allowing such compensation as the court determines reasonable to the attorney for services rendered to the guardian or conservator. The compensation so allowed shall thereupon be charged against the estate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2643.

(a) Except as provided in Section 2643.1, on petition by the guardian or conservator of the person or estate, or both, the court may by order authorize periodic payments on account to any one or more of the following persons for the services rendered by that person during the period covered by each payment:

(1) The guardian of the person.

(2) The guardian of the estate.

(3) The conservator of the person.

(4) The conservator of the estate.

(5) The attorney for the guardian or conservator of the person or estate, or both.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(c) The petition shall describe the services to be rendered on a periodic basis and the reason why authority to make periodic payments is requested. In fixing the amount of the periodic payment, the court shall take into account the services to be rendered on a periodic basis and the reasonable value of those services. The guardian or conservator of the estate may make the periodic payments authorized by the order only if the services described in the petition are actually rendered. The payments made pursuant to the order are subject to review by the court upon the next succeeding account of the guardian or conservator of the estate to
 determine that the services were actually rendered and that the amount paid on account was not unreasonable, and the court shall make an appropriate order if the court determines that the amount paid on account was either excessive or inadequate in view of the services actually rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 248, Sec. 6.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2643.1.

(a) On petition by a guardian or conservator of the person or estate, or both, who is a professional fiduciary, as described in Section 2340 and who is required to be licensed under the Professional Fiduciaries Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), the court may by order authorize periodic payments on account to a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 2643 for the services rendered by that person during the period covered by each payment only if that person has filed a proposed hourly fee schedule or another statement of his or her proposed compensation from the estate of the ward or conservatee for services performed as a guardian or conservator, as required by Section 2614.7, and only after the
 court has addressed any objections filed pursuant to subdivision (d). 

(b) The petition shall describe the services to be rendered on a periodic basis, the reason why authority to make periodic payments is requested, and a good faith estimate of the fees to be charged by the professional fiduciary from the date the petition is filed up to, and including, the date of the next succeeding account required by Section 2620 or, if the next succeeding account required by Section 2620 is due in less than one year, a good faith estimate of the fees to be charged by the professional fiduciary from the date the petition is filed through the next succeeding 12 months, inclusive. Prior to ordering periodic payments or fixing the amount of the periodic payment, the court shall determine whether making periodic payments is in the best interest of the ward or conservatee, taking into consideration the needs of the ward or conservatee and the need to preserve
 and protect the estate. If the court determines that making periodic payments is not in the best interest of the ward or conservatee, the court shall deny the petition to authorize periodic payments. If the court determines that making periodic payments is in the best interest of the ward or conservatee, the court shall fix the amount of the periodic payment. In fixing the amount of the periodic payment, the court shall take into account the services to be rendered on a periodic basis and the reasonable value of those services.

(c) (1) Notice of the hearing on the petition and notice of how to file an objection to the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(2) The notices required by paragraph (1) shall be made to the court investigator for the period and in the manner provided
 in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(d) (1) Any person entitled to notice under paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) may file with the court a written objection to the authorization of periodic payments on account. The court clerk shall set any objections for a hearing no fewer than 15 days after the date the objections are filed.

(2) If an objection is filed pursuant to paragraph (1), the guardian or conservator shall have the burden of establishing the necessity for and amount, if any, of periodic payments.

(e) The guardian or conservator of the estate may make the periodic payments authorized by the order only if the services described in the petition are actually rendered. The payments made pursuant to the order shall be reviewed by the court upon the next succeeding account
 of the guardian or conservator of the estate to determine that the services were actually rendered and that the amount paid on account was reasonable and in the best interest of the ward or conservatee, taking into consideration the needs of the ward or conservatee and the need to preserve and protect the estate. The court shall make an appropriate order reducing the guardian or conservator’s compensation if the court determines that the amount paid on account was either unreasonable or not in the best interest of the ward or conservatee in view of the services actually rendered.

(f) The authorization for periodic payments granted pursuant to this section shall terminate on a date determined by the court, but not later than the due date of the next succeeding account required by Section 2620. Nothing in this section shall preclude a guardian or conservator from filing a subsequent petition to receive periodic payments pursuant to this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 248, Sec. 7.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2644.

(a) Where it is to the advantage, benefit, and best interest of the ward or conservatee or the estate, the guardian or conservator of the estate may contract with an attorney for a contingent fee for the attorney’s services in representing the ward or conservatee or the estate in connection with a matter that is of a type that is customarily the subject of a contingent fee contract, but such a contract is valid only if (1) the contract is made pursuant to an order of the court authorizing the guardian or conservator to execute the contract or (2) the contract is approved by order of the court.

(b) To obtain an order under this section, the guardian or conservator shall file a petition with the court showing the advantage, benefit, and best interest to the ward or conservatee or the estate of the contingent fee contract. A copy of the contingent fee contract shall be attached to the petition.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(d) As used in this section, “court” includes either of the following:

(1) The court in which the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding is pending.

(2) Where the contract is in connection with a matter in litigation, the court in which the litigation is pending.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2645.

(a) No attorney who is a guardian or conservator shall receive any compensation from the guardianship or conservatorship estate for legal services performed for the guardian or conservator unless the court specifically approves the right to the compensation and finds that it is to the advantage, benefit, and best interests of the ward or conservatee.

(b) No parent, child, sibling, or spouse of a person who is a guardian or conservator, and no law partnership or corporation whose partner, shareholder, or employee is serving as a guardian or conservator shall receive any compensation for legal services performed for the guardian or conservator unless the court specifically approves the right to the compensation and finds that it is to the advantage, benefit, and best interests of the ward or conservatee.

(c) This section shall not apply if the guardian or conservator is related by blood or marriage to, or is a cohabitant with, the ward or conservatee.

(d) After full disclosure of the relationships of all persons to receive compensation for legal services under this section, the court may, in its discretion and at any time, approve the right to that compensation, including any time during the pendency of any of the following orders:

(1) An order appointing the guardian or conservator.

(2) An order approving the general plan under Section 1831.

(3) An order settling any account of the guardian or conservator.

(4) An order approving a separate petition, with notice given under Section 2581.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 293, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2646.

In proceedings under this chapter, the court shall only determine fees that are payable from the estate of the ward or conservatee and not limit fees payable from other sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 730, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2647.

No attorney fees may be paid from the estate of the ward or conservatee without prior court order. The estate of the ward or conservatee is not obligated to pay attorney fees established by any engagement agreement or other contract until it has been approved by the court. This does not preclude an award of fees by the court pursuant to this chapter even if the contractual obligations are unenforceable pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 553, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Removal or Resignation [2650. - 2662.]



  ARTICLE 1. Removal of Guardian or Conservator [2650. - 2655.]

2650.

A guardian or conservator may be removed for any of the following causes:

(a) Failure to use ordinary care and diligence in the management of the estate.

(b) Failure to file an inventory or an account within the time allowed by law or by court order.

(c) Continued failure to perform duties or incapacity to perform duties suitably.

(d) Conviction of a felony, whether before or after appointment as guardian or conservator.

(e) Gross immorality.

(f) Having such an interest adverse to the faithful performance of duties that there is an unreasonable risk that the guardian or conservator will fail faithfully to perform duties.

(g) In the case of a guardian of the person or a conservator of the person, acting in violation of any provision of Section 2356.

(h) In the case of a guardian of the estate or a conservator of the estate, insolvency or bankruptcy of the guardian or conservator.

(i) In the case of a conservator appointed by a court in another jurisdiction, removal because that person would not have been appointed in this state despite being eligible to serve under the law of this state.

(j) In any other case in which the court in
 its discretion determines that removal is in the best interests of the ward or conservatee; but, in considering the best interests of the ward, if the guardian was nominated under Section 1500 or 1501, the court shall take that fact into consideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 26.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Operative January 1, 2016, by Stats. 2014, Ch. 553, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2651.

The ward or conservatee, the spouse of the ward or the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee, any relative or friend of the ward or conservatee, or any interested person may apply by petition to the court to have the guardian or conservator removed. The petition shall state facts showing cause for removal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2652.

Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2653.

(a) The guardian or conservator, the ward or conservatee, the spouse of the ward or the spouse or registered domestic partner of the conservatee, a relative or friend of the ward or conservatee, and any interested person may appear at the hearing and support or oppose the petition.

(b) If the court determines that cause for removal of the guardian or conservator exists, the court may remove the guardian or conservator, revoke the letters of guardianship or conservatorship, and enter judgment accordingly and, in the case of a guardianship or conservatorship of the estate, order the guardian or conservator to file an accounting and to surrender the
 estate to the person legally entitled thereto. If the guardian or conservator fails to file the accounting as ordered, the court may compel the accounting pursuant to Section 2620.2.

(c) If the court removes the guardian or conservator for cause, as described in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, of Section 2650 or Section 2655, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The court shall award the petitioner the costs of the petition and other expenses and costs of litigation, including attorney’s fees, incurred under this article.

(2) The guardian or conservator may not deduct from, or charge to, the estate the guardian’s or conservator’s costs of opposing the petition for removal, and is personally liable for those costs
 and expenses.

(3) If the court removes a professional fiduciary as guardian or conservator for cause, the court shall report that determination and the basis for removal to the Professional Fiduciaries Bureau. If the court reports an action taken under this section, the court shall provide the bureau, at no charge, with access to the information, including confidential information, regarding its investigation of the professional fiduciary contained in court records. The bureau shall maintain the confidentiality of the information, as required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 6580 of the Business and Professions Code or any other applicable state or federal law.

(d) A
 superior court shall not be required to perform any duties imposed pursuant to the amendments to this section enacted by the measure that added this subdivision until the Legislature makes an appropriation identified for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 417, Sec. 26.   (AB 1194)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2654.

Whenever it appears that the ward or conservatee or the estate may suffer loss or injury during the time required for notice and hearing under this article, the court, on its own motion or on petition, may do either or both of the following:

(a) Suspend the powers of the guardian or conservator pending notice and hearing to such extent as the court deems necessary.

(b) Compel the guardian or conservator to surrender the estate to a custodian designated by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2655.

(a) A guardian or conservator may be removed from office if the guardian or conservator is found in contempt for disobeying an order of the court.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a guardian or conservator may be removed from office under subdivision (a) by a court order reciting the facts and without further showing or notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Resignation of Guardian or Conservator [2660. - 2662.]

2660.

A guardian or conservator may at any time file with the court a petition tendering the resignation of the guardian or conservator. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given for the period and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1. The court shall allow such resignation when it appears proper, to take effect at such time as the court shall fix, and may make any order as may be necessary to deal with the guardianship or conservatorship during the period prior to the appointment of a new guardian or conservator and the settlement of the accounts of the resigning guardian or conservator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2662.

Whenever the court grants a petition removing the guardian or conservator of a minor ward or conservatee or tendering the resignation of the guardian or conservator of a minor ward or conservatee, if the court does not immediately appoint a successor guardian or conservator, the court shall at the same time appoint a responsible adult to make educational decisions for the minor until a successor guardian or conservator is appointed. Whenever the court suspends or limits the powers of the guardian or conservator to make educational decisions for a minor ward or conservatee, the court shall at the same time appoint a responsible adult to make educational decisions for the minor ward or conservatee until the guardian or conservator is again authorized to make educational decisions for the minor ward or conservatee. An individual who would have a conflict of interest in representing the child may not be appointed to make educational decisions. For purposes of this section, “an individual who would have a conflict of interest,” means a person having any interests that might restrict or bias his or her ability to make educational decisions, including, but not limited to, those conflicts of interest prohibited by Section 1126 of the Government Code, and the receipt of compensation or attorneys’ fees for the provision of services pursuant to this section. A foster parent may not be deemed to have a conflict of interest solely because he or she receives compensation for the provision of services pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 180, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Appointment of Successor Guardian or Conservator [2670. - 2689.]



  ARTICLE 1. Appointment of Successor Guardian [2670. - 2670.]

2670.

When for any reason a vacancy occurs in the office of guardian, the court may appoint a successor guardian, after notice and hearing as in the case of an original appointment of a guardian.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Appointment of Successor Conservator [2680. - 2689.]

2680.

When for any reason a vacancy occurs in the office of conservator, the court may appoint a successor conservator in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2681.

A petition for appointment of a successor conservator may be filed by any of the following:

(a) The conservatee.

(b) The spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee.

(c) A relative of the conservatee.

(d) Any interested state or local entity or agency of this state or any interested public officer or employee of this state or of a local public entity of this state.

(e) Any other interested person or friend of the conservatee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2682.

(a) The petition shall request that a successor conservator be appointed for the person or estate, or both, and shall specify the name and address of the proposed successor conservator and the name and address of the conservatee.

(b) The petition shall set forth, so far as they are known to the petitioner, the names and addresses of the spouse or domestic partner and of the relatives of the conservatee within the second degree.

(c) If the petition is filed by one other than the conservatee, the petition shall state whether or not the petitioner is a creditor or debtor of the conservatee.

(d) If the conservatee is a patient in or on leave of absence from a state institution under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services and that fact is known to the petitioner, the petition shall state that fact and name the institution.

(e) The petition shall state, so far as is known to the petitioner, whether or not the conservatee is receiving or is entitled to receive benefits from the Veterans Administration and the estimated amount of the monthly benefit payable by the Veterans Administration for the conservatee.

(f) The petition shall state whether or not the conservatee will be present at the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 48.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2683.

(a) At least 15 days before the hearing on the petition for appointment of a successor conservator, notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given as provided in this section. The notice shall be accompanied by a copy of the petition.

(b) Notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the persons designated in Section 1460 and to the relatives named in the petition.

(c) If notice is required by Section 1461 to be given to the Director of State Hospitals or the Director of Developmental Services, notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 as required.

(d) If notice is required by Section 1461.5 to be given to the
 Veterans Administration, notice shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 as required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 50.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2684.

Unless the petition states that the conservatee will be present at the hearing, the court investigator shall do all of the following:

(a) Interview the conservatee personally.

(b) Inform the conservatee of the nature of the proceeding to appoint a successor conservator, the name of the person proposed as successor conservator, and the conservatee’s right to appear personally at the hearing, to object to the person proposed as successor conservator, to nominate a person to be appointed as successor conservator, to be represented by legal counsel if the conservatee so chooses, and to have legal counsel
 appointed by the court if unable to retain legal counsel.

(c) Determine whether the conservatee objects to the person proposed as successor conservator or prefers another person to be appointed.

(d) If the conservatee is not represented by legal counsel, determine whether the conservatee wishes to be represented by legal counsel and, if so, determine the name of an attorney the conservatee wishes to retain or whether the conservatee desires the court to appoint legal counsel.

(e) Determine whether the appointment of legal counsel would be helpful to the resolution of the matter or is necessary to protect the interests of the conservatee in any case where the conservatee does not plan to retain legal counsel and has
 not requested the appointment of legal counsel by the court.

(f) Report to the court in writing, at least five days before the hearing, concerning all of the foregoing, including the conservatee’s express communications concerning representation by legal counsel and whether the conservatee objects to the person proposed as successor conservator or prefers that some other person be appointed.

(g) Deliver pursuant to Section 1215, at least five days before the hearing, a copy of the report referred to in subdivision (f) to all of the following:

(1) The attorney, if any, for the petitioner.

(2) The attorney, if any, for the conservatee.

(3) Any other persons as the court orders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 51.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2685.

If the conservatee is present at the hearing, prior to making an order appointing a successor conservator the court shall do all of the following:

(a) Inform the conservatee of the nature and purpose of the proceeding.

(b) Inform the conservatee that the conservatee has the right to object to the person proposed as successor conservator, to nominate a person to be appointed as successor conservator, and, if not represented by legal counsel, to be represented by legal counsel if the conservatee so chooses and to have legal counsel appointed by the court if unable to retain legal counsel.

(c) After the court so informs the conservatee, the court shall consult the conservatee to determine the conservatee’s opinion concerning the question of who should be appointed as successor conservator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2686.

If the petition states that the conservatee will be present at the hearing and the conservatee fails to appear at the hearing, the court shall continue the hearing and direct the court investigator to perform the duties set forth in Section 2684.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2687.

The conservatee, the spouse, the domestic partner, or any relative or friend of the conservatee, or any other interested person may appear at the hearing to support or oppose the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 893, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2688.

(a) The court shall determine the question of who should be appointed as successor conservator according to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1810) of Chapter 1 of Part 3.

(b) The order appointing the successor conservator shall contain, among other things, the names, addresses and telephone numbers of the successor conservator, the conservatee’s attorney, if any, and the court investigator, if any.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2689.

If the conservatee is an “absentee” as defined in Section 1403:

(a) The petition for appointment of a successor conservator shall contain the matters required by Section 1841 in addition to the matters required by Section 2682.

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be given as provided by Section 1842 in addition to the requirements of Section 2683, except that notice need not be given to the conservatee.

(c) An interview and report by the court investigator is not required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Requests for Special Notice [2700. - 2702.]

2700.

(a) (1) At any time after the issuance of letters of guardianship or conservatorship, the ward, if over 14 years of age or the conservatee, the spouse of the ward or the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee, any relative or creditor of the ward or conservatee, or any other interested person, in person or by attorney, may file with the court clerk a written request for special notice.

(2) An “interested person” may include, but is not limited to, a family member of the conservatee not included in Section 1460 or a friend of the conservatee.

(b) The request for special notice shall be so entitled and
 shall set forth the name of the person and the address to which notices shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215.

(c) Special notice may be requested of any one or more of the following matters:

(1) Petitions filed in the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding.

(2) Inventories and appraisals of property in the estate, including any supplemental inventories and appraisals.

(3) Accounts of the guardian or conservator.

(4) Proceedings for the final termination of the guardianship or conservatorship proceeding.

(d) Special
 notice may be requested of:

(1) Any one or more of the matters in subdivision (c) by describing the matter or matters.

(2) All the matters in subdivision (c) by referring generally to “the matters described in subdivision (c) of Section 2700 of the Probate Code” or by using words of similar meaning.

(e) A copy of the request shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 to the guardian or conservator or to the attorney for the guardian or conservator. If personally delivered, the request is effective when it is delivered. If mailed or electronically delivered, the request is effective when it is received.

(f) If the original of the request is filed with the court
 clerk, it shall be accompanied by a written admission or proof of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 455, Sec. 4.   (SB 1106)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.

(a) A request for special notice may be modified or withdrawn in the same manner as provided for the making of the initial request.

(b) A new request for special notice may be served and filed at any time as provided in the case of an initial request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 493, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

(a) Unless the court makes an order dispensing with the notice, if a request has been made pursuant to this chapter for special notice of a hearing, the person filing the petition, account, or other paper shall give written notice pursuant to Section 1215 of the filing, together with a copy of the petition, account, or other paper, and the time and place set for the hearing, to the person named in the request at the address set forth in the request, at least 15 days before the time set for the hearing.

(b) If a request has been made pursuant to this chapter for special notice of the filing of an inventory and appraisal of the estate or of the filing
 of any other paper that does not require a hearing, the inventory and appraisal or other paper shall be delivered pursuant to Section 1215 not later than 15 days after the inventory and appraisal or other paper is filed with the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 53.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Transfer of Personal Property out of State [2800. - 2808.]

2800.

As used in this chapter, “foreign guardian or conservator” means a guardian, conservator, committee, or comparable fiduciary in another jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2801.

Subject to the limitations and requirements of this chapter, the court in which the guardianship of the estate or conservatorship of the estate is pending may order the transfer of some or all of the personal property of the estate to a foreign guardian or conservator in another jurisdiction outside this state where the ward or conservatee resides at the time the petition for the order authorizing the transfer is filed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2802.

A petition for an order authorizing a transfer may be filed by any of the following:

(a) The guardian of the estate or the conservator of the estate.

(b) The ward or conservatee.

(c) A foreign guardian or conservator.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2803.

The petition shall set forth all of the following:

(a) The name and address of:

(1) The foreign guardian or conservator, who may but need not be the guardian or conservator appointed in this state.

(2) The ward or conservatee.

(3) The guardian or conservator, so far as is known to the petitioner.

(b) The names, ages, and addresses, so far as they are known to the petitioner, of the spouse of the ward or the spouse or domestic partner of the conservatee and of relatives of the ward or conservatee within the second degree.

(c) A brief description of the character, condition, value, and location of the personal property sought to be transferred.

(d) A statement whether the foreign guardian or conservator has agreed to accept the transfer of the property. If the foreign guardian or conservator has so agreed, the acceptance shall be attached as an exhibit to the petition or otherwise filed with the court.

(e) A statement of the manner in which and by whom the foreign guardian or conservator was appointed.

(f) A general statement of the qualifications of the foreign guardian or conservator.

(g) The amount of bond, if any, of the foreign guardian or conservator.

(h) A general statement of the nature and value of the property of the ward or conservatee already under the management or control of the foreign guardian or conservator.

(i) The name of the court having jurisdiction of the foreign guardian or conservator or of the accounts of the foreign guardian or conservator or, if none, the court in which a proceeding may be had with respect to the guardianship or conservatorship if the property is transferred.
